Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 2 DEFINITIONS — GENERAL PROVISIONS
§ 63-219. Uniform property rolls and related documents.

The state tax commission shall develop, maintain and enforce statewide systems for the preparation of property rolls and related documents and procedures and for uniform parcel numbering. Said systems shall provide related information specified by the state tax commission.

The state tax commission shall prescribe forms and documents to be used to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when the information contained in said forms and documents is needed by the tax commission. The appropriate county official may request that the state tax commission consider an alternate, but equivalent, system for the preparation of property rolls and related documents. If the county official demonstrates equivalence to the satisfaction of the state tax commission, the state tax commission may, at its discretion, permit the alternate system to be used. Alternate forms or documents to be provided at county expense may be used if submitted to the state tax commission prior to use and if, in the opinion of the state tax commission, the alternate forms or documents are equivalent to the forms or documents provided by the state tax commission.

Forms or documents required to comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section may be prescribed by the appropriate county official, provided that the information on said forms or documents is not needed by the state tax commission. Said forms or documents must be provided at county expense and a copy of each separate form or document must be filed with the state tax commission prior to use.

The state tax commission shall, at its expense, provide aid to the counties on numbering, mapping and software for implementation of this program, and shall, at its expense, provide uniform valuation assessment notices to the county assessor and property tax notices to the county tax collector.

§ 63-220. Tax extensions as disaster relief.

The board of county commissioners of any Idaho county declared by the governor of the state of Idaho as a natural disaster area may grant an extension of time for any filings or payments required under section 63-302(1), 63-602G, 63-706 or 63-903, Idaho Code, to those persons whose ability to timely comply with their filing or payment requirement is adversely affected by a natural disaster set forth in the declaration.

Before granting any extension the board of county commissioners shall provide a procedure for affected taxpayers to justify the extension and provide such other information as the board may require to support the taxpayer’s application.

No extension granted under this section shall be for a period in excess of sixty (60) days.

In all cases where the board has granted an extension under this section, payment of the tax shall not be subject to any late filing penalty or interest if payment of the tax is made on or before the extended due date. Failure to make payments on or before the extended due date will thereafter cause the imposition of penalty and interest.

When, as a result of relief granted under this section, a county official or state agency is unable to comply with a provision in this title requiring an action by a specified date, the action may be delayed only for such reasonably necessary time as the state tax commission approves, but not to exceed sixty (60) days.